Utah statutes.
9-3-607.   Notes, bonds, other obligation -- Not debt liability -- Expenses
payable from funds provided -- Agency without authority to incur liability on
behalf of state.
(1) (a)  An obligation or liability of the authority does not constitute:
(i)  a debt or liability of the state or of any of its political subdivisions;
or
(ii)  the loaning of credit of the state or of any of its political
subdivisions.
(b)  An obligation or liability of the authority is payable only from funds of
the authority.
(2)  An obligation of the authority shall contain a statement to the effect:
(a)  that the authority is obligated to pay the obligation solely from the
revenues or other funds of the authority;
(b)  that neither the state nor its political subdivisions are obligated to
pay it; and
(c)  that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state or
any of its political subdivisions is pledged to the payment of the obligation.
(3) (a)  Expenses incurred in carrying out this part are payable solely from
funds of the authority provided under this part.
(b)  Nothing in this part authorizes the authority to incur indebtedness or
liability on behalf of or payable by the state or any of its political
subdivisions.
